District of Columbia statutes.
5-132.06

Applicability of §§ 5-132.02 and 5-132.03.

Sections 5-132.02 and 5-132.03 shall apply as of the first day of October 1, 2005, or upon the submission by the Mayor to the Council of a supplemental budget to effect the transfer of funds from DCPS to the MPD, whichever occurs first, and Council approval pursuant to § 5-132.04(c).

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-350, § 106, 52 DCR 2005

History

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 7 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-318, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4707).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Metropolitan Police Department School Safety and Security Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-496, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8797).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-596, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11219).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-3, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2675).

Emergency Legislation